California, session 20252026, AB308.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(a) Pursuant to Senate Bill 882 (Chapter 899 of the Statutes of 2022), the Department of Justice convened an advisory council to examine interactions between law enforcement and individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.(b) The report issued to the Legislature in 2026 identified significant systemic gaps in the training of peace officers and in cross-system coordination, highlighted that law enforcement frequently serves as the primary responder to behavioral and mental health crises involving individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities, and identified the need for improved preventive supports and alternatives to law enforcement response.SEC. 2. Section 4755 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4755. (a) (1) The department shall conduct a statewide evaluation of safety training services provided by regional centers.(2) The evaluation required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Identification of which regional centers currently offer or fund safety training services, including service models, service codes, delivery methods, and populations served.(B) Identification of gaps in access to safety training services across regional centers and geographic regions of the state.(C) An analysis of the staffing, training, and community partnerships required to implement safety training services, including partnerships with law enforcement agencies, fire departments, and emergency medical service providers.(D) An estimate of the costs associated with developing, implementing, and sustaining safety training services in regional centers that do not currently offer those services.(E) Recommendations for standardizing safety training services statewide, including service definitions, delivery models, staffing requirements, and measurable outcome indicators.(b) (1) The department shall submit a report to the Legislature on or before July 1, 2028, summarizing the findings and recommendations required pursuant to this section.(2) The report shall include recommendations for all of the following:(A) Reducing unnecessary law enforcement involvement and hospitalizations through preventive services, including safety training services delivered through regional centers.(B) Establishing standardized, statewide protocols for responding to crises involving individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.(C) Integrating safety training services into the individualized program planning process to reduce crisis incidence and improve outcomes.(3) In developing recommendations to be included in the report pursuant to paragraph (2), the department shall prioritize culturally responsive, trauma-informed, and neurodiversity-affirming approaches, and ensure accessibility for individuals with limited verbal communication or complex support needs.(4) (A) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(c) In conducting the evaluation and developing recommendations, the department may consult with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, individuals with disabilities, family members, advocacy organizations, service providers, regional centers, and representatives of law enforcement and emergency response agencies.(d) For purposes of this section, “safety training services” means a structured service or program designed to increase an individual’s ability to safely navigate community settings and emergency situations, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Safe interaction with peace officers, first responders, and emergency personnel.(2) Wandering and elopement prevention strategies.(3) Emergency preparedness and response, including recognizing and responding to fire, medical, and public safety emergencies. (4) Strategies for seeking help, including identifying safe individuals and locations.(5) Use of communication tools and techniques to effectively convey needs and information in high-stress or crisis situations, including augmentative and alternative communication, as appropriate.(6) Development of individualized safety plans based on the needs and preferences of the individual.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to, upon receipt and review of the report required pursuant to subdivision (b), consider a one-time appropriation, and any necessary ongoing funding, to the department for the purpose of developing, implementing, and sustaining safety training services statewide, including the provision of technical assistance to regional centers and service providers.SECTION 1.Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 8300) is added to Division 8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:10.County Behavioral Health Mobile Crisis Procedures8300.For purposes of this chapter, “intellectual or developmental disability” has the same meaning as “developmental disability” in Section 4512.8301.In the case of a county that operates, or that contracts for the operation of, a mobile crisis team or a mobile crisis unit, the county behavioral health director may develop procedures for the mobile crisis team or unit that include the handling of an emergency situation, or a crisis incident, involving an individual with an intellectual or developmental disability, including, but not limited to, autism, or involving an individual with a behavioral health condition.